Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,213
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

(MBCA 15.20) (a) A foreign
corporation authorized to transact business in this state may not withdraw
from this state until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary
of State.

(b) A foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state may apply for a certificate
of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing.
The application must set forth:

(1) The name of the foreign corporation and the name
of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(2) That it is not transacting
business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business
in this state;

(3)
That it revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on
its behalf and consents that service of process in any proceeding based on
a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business
in this state may thereafter be made on such corporation outside this state;
and

(4)
A mailing address at which process against the corporation may be served.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 213.